Maryland, session 2026, SB0266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1318.
– 1 –

Ch. 209 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section[, “invasive] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “INVASIVE bamboo” means NONNATIVE bamboo that is characterized
by aggressive spreading behavior, including bamboo species in the genus Phyllostachys.
(3) “LISTED INVASIVE TREE” MEANS ANY TREE ON THE “MARYLAND
PROHIBITED INVASIVE PLANTS PLANT LIST” POSTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE.
(4) “NATIVE TREE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM” MEANS A PROGRAM
WHEREBY A PERSON RECEIVES A NATIVE TREE IN EXCHANGE FOR REMOVING AND
ERADICATING AN INVASIVE TREE.
(3) (5) “TREE OF HEAVEN” MEANS THE AILANTHUS ALTISSIMA
TREE SPECIES.
(b) This section applies to all counties and municipalities.
(c) The governing body of a county or municipality, by ordinance, may regulate
invasive bamboo, LISTED INVASIVE TREES, OR TREES OF HEAVEN, including by
prohibiting a person from:
(1) selling invasive bamboo, LISTED INVASIVE TREES, OR TREES OF
HEAVEN;
(2) planting invasive bamboo, LISTED INVASIVE TREES, OR TREES OF
HEAVEN; [and]
(3) allowing invasive bamboo, LISTED INVASIVE TREES, to grow on the
property of the person without proper upkeep and appropriate containment measures,
including barriers or trenches; AND
(4) ALLOWING TREES OF HEAVEN OR OTHER LISTED INVASIVE TREES
TO GROW ON THE PERSON’S PROPERTY.
(d) The governing body of a county or municipality may provide for the
enforcement of an ordinance adopted under this section by:
(1) requiring any damages caused by invasive bamboo, LISTED INVASIVE
TREES, OR TREES OF HEAVEN OR OTHER LISTED INVASIVE TREES to be mitigated; and
(2) establishing a civil fine.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 209
(E) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY ESTABLISH
A BOUNTY OR NATIVE TREE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM TO INCENTIVIZE THE
REMOVAL AND ERADICATION OF TREES OF HEAVEN AND OTHER LISTED INVASIVE
TREES.
(F) A BOUNTY OR NATIVE TREE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL REQUIRE:
(1) AN INVASIVE TREE TO BE PROPERLY IDENTIFIED CONSISTENT
WITH THE SPECIES PAGE PUBLISHED BY THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND
AGRICULTURE EXTENSION; AND
(2) THE INVASIVE SPECIES, AFTER BEING PROPERLY IDENTIFIED, TO
BE REMOVED OR ERADICATED ACCORDING TO PROFESSIONALLY ACCEPTED
METHODS OR CONSISTENT WITH METHODOLOGY ON THE SPECIES PAGE PUBLISHED
BY THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND AGRICULTURE EXTENSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –